Wisconsin, session 2025, SB251.
do enact as follows:SB251,11Section 1. 609.835 of the statutes is created to read:SB251,2,42609.835 Coverage of prescription drugs and medical supplies to treat 3asthma. Limited service health organizations, preferred provider plans, and 4defined network plans are subject to s. 632.895 (16g).SB251,25Section 2. 632.895 (16g) of the statutes is created to read:SB251,2,96632.895 (16g) Coverage of prescription drugs and medical supplies to 7treat asthma. (a) In this subsection, “related medical supplies” includes asthma 8inhalers and other medical supply items necessary to effectively and appropriately 9administer a prescription drug prescribed to treat asthma.SB251,2,1310(b) Subject to par. (c), every disability insurance policy and every self-insured 11health plan of the state or of a county, city, town, village, or school district that 12provides coverage of prescription drugs shall cover prescription drugs and related 13medical supplies for the treatment of asthma.SB251,2,2014(c) A disability insurance policy or self-insured health plan of the state or of a 15county, city, town, village, or school district to which par. (b) applies shall limit the 16amount of any enrollee cost-sharing to no more than $25 per one-month supply for 17each prescription drug prescribed to treat asthma and to no more than $50 per 18month for all related medical supplies. The cost-sharing limitations under this 19paragraph may not increase with the number of conditions for which an enrollee is 20treated. Coverage under this subsection may not be subject to any deductible.SB251,3,91(d) If, under federal law, application of par. (c) would result in ineligibility for 2a health savings account under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, par. (c) 3shall apply to a health-savings-account-qualified high deductible health plan with 4respect to the deductible of such a plan only after the enrollee has satisfied the 5minimum deductible under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, except with 6respect to items or services that are preventive care pursuant to section 223 (c) (2) 7(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, in which case par. (c) shall apply regardless of 8whether the minimum deductible under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code 9has been satisfied.SB251,310Section 3. Initial applicability.SB251,3,1311(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this 12act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 13subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).SB251,3,1814(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 15agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 16policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 17on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 18modified, or renewed, whichever is later.SB251,419Section 4. Effective date.SB251,3,2120(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 21publication.SB251,3,2222